Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 9
PROTECTION OF ARCHEOLOGICAL, ABORIGINAL, PREHISTORIC, AND HISTORIC SITES

Cross references.

- Protection of American Indian human remains and burial objects,

§

44-12-260

et seq.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- State parks and historic sites systems, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-5-1 et seq.

12-3-620. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"American Indian" means an individual who is a member of a nation, tribe, band, group, or community that was indigenous to Georgia; is a descendant of persons named as American Indians in the Georgia Senate Bill 89, enacted during the legislative session of 1839 (Ga. L. 1839, p. 374); or is a descendant of persons included in the United States Indian Claims Commission, Docket 21, 1962, and those sequel dockets pertaining to the Creek Nation east of the Mississippi.

"Burial object" means an object that, as a part of the death rite or ceremony of a culture, is reasonably believed to have been placed with individual human remains either at the time of death or later. Such term includes any item defined in paragraph (4) of Code Section 36-72-2 and may also include but not be limited to urns; whole or broken ceramic, metal, or glass vessels; chipped stone tools; ground stone tools; worked bone and shell items; clothing; medals; buttons; jewelry; firearms; edged weapons; and the caskets or containers for the human remains.

"Council" means the Council on American Indian Concerns established by Code Section 44-12-280.

"Human remains" means the bodies of deceased human beings in any stage of decomposition, including cremated remains.

"Object of cultural patrimony" means an object having ongoing historical, traditional, or cultural importance central to a group or culture itself, rather than property owned by an individual, and which, therefore, cannot be alienated, appropriated, or conveyed by any individual regardless of whether or not the individual is a member of a tribe or an organization.

"Sacred object" means a specific ceremonial object which is used by a religious leader for the practice of a religion by the present day adherents of such religion.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-620

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1790, § 2.)

12-3-621. Prohibited acts as to archeological, aboriginal, prehistoric, or historic sites; notification of state archeologist before beginning investigation or disturbance of site; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person or entity not operating under the provisions of Section 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act, as amended, or the express written permission of the owner willfully or knowingly to:

Dig, probe, break, crack, carve upon, write upon, burn, or otherwise mark upon, remove, or in any manner destroy, disturb, deface, mar, or harm the structures, features, surfaces, or contents of archeological, aboriginal, prehistoric, or historic sites; provided, however, that except for human remains and burial objects, this paragraph shall not apply to the collecting of artifacts exposed on the surface of dry land;

Disturb or alter in any manner the prevailing condition of any archeological, aboriginal, prehistoric, or historic site; provided, however, that except for human remains and burial objects, this paragraph shall not apply to the collecting of artifacts exposed on the surface of dry land;

Break, force, tamper with, or otherwise disturb a lock, gate, door, or other obstruction designed to control or prevent access to any area containing an archeological, aboriginal, prehistoric, or historic site or artifacts, even though entrance thereto may not be gained; or

Enter an archeological, aboriginal, prehistoric, or historic site posted against trespassing or a site with a lock, gate, door, or other obstruction designed to control or prevent access to the site.

When the surface of any archeological, aboriginal, prehistoric, or historic site is disturbed by a person not documented as operating under the provisions of Section 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act, as amended, for the purpose of investigating the site or discovering artifacts with the written permission of the landowner, such person shall notify the state archeologist before beginning any such investigation or disturbance. The state archeologist shall maintain a web site and telephone hot line, available at all times, for the purpose of receiving notice in such form as shall be specified by policy of the department. The state archeologist shall immediately notify the Council on American Indian Concerns created by Code Section 44-12-280 of any such investigation that might involve American Indian human remains or burial objects. The state archeologist shall make available to the council any information pertaining to investigations conducted pursuant to Section 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act, as amended.

Possession of any archeological artifact collected on or after July 1, 2001, without the written permission of the owner of the land from which the artifact was removed shall be prima-facie evidence that the archeological artifact was taken in violation of this chapter. As to archeological artifacts unlawfully in the possession of any person or entity, same shall be confiscated and held by the appropriate law enforcement official(s) and shall be returned by said official(s) to the property owner from whose property the artifacts were improperly removed.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-621

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1790, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 313, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 166, § 1/HB 177.)

Cross references.

- State archeologist,

§

12-3-53

.

Council on American Indian Concerns,

§

44-12-280

.

U.S. Code.

- Section 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act, referred to in subsection (b), is codified at 16 U.S.C.

§

470f.

12-3-622. Buying, selling, trading, importing, or exporting American Indian burial, sacred, or cultural objects.

After December 1, 1992, it shall be unlawful for any person to buy, sell, trade, import, or export for purposes of buying, selling, or trading for profit any American Indian burial object, sacred object, or object of cultural patrimony, with knowledge that the object is an American Indian burial or sacred object or an object of cultural patrimony.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, may be punished by a fine not to exceed $500.00 for each burial object, sacred object, or object of cultural patrimony involved in such violation.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-622

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1790, § 2.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, a comma was inserted following "selling" in subsection (a).